District of Columbia statutes.
40-307.01

Artisan’s lien — Generally.

Any mechanic or artisan who shall make, alter, or repair any article of personal property at the request of the owner shall have a lien thereon for his just and reasonable charges for his work done and materials furnished, and may retain the same in his possession until said charges are paid; but if possession is parted with by his consent such lien shall cease.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1388, ch. 854, § 1260

History

This section is referenced in § 40-307.02.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 38-124.
1973 Ed., § 38-124.

Prior Codifications